Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 2

Divisions of Department [Repealed or Transferred]

43-1-201. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-1-201 (Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 30; Code 1932, § 295; C. Supp. 1950, § 295; Shan. Supp., § 373a72; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-101), concerning organization of department into three divisions, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 878, § 18.

43-1-202, 43-1-203. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 43-1-202 and 43-1-203 (Acts 1973, ch. 83, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. § 43-114, 43-115), concerning the division of consumer affairs, were transferred to title 47, ch. 18, part 50, effective August 1, 1988.